California statutes. Public Resources Code
(c) The board may adopt regulations that require substantially similar labeling requirements for rechargeable batteries with chemistries that are different from those covered by subdivision (a) and the battery packs and products containing those batteries. Any regulations shall be adopted, amended, or repealed in accordance with Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(d) Any violation of this section is a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 816, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

15014.

(a) Any manufacturer of, or any manufacturer trade organization with respect to, any rechargeable battery or rechargeable consumer product may submit an application to the board for an exemption from the requirements of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 51013 in accordance with the procedures prescribed in subdivision (b). Within 60 days of receipt of an application for an exemption, the board shall either approve or deny the request. The exemption shall be issued for a period that is determined to be appropriate by the board, but shall not exceed two years.

(b) The application for an exemption shall include both of the following:

(1) A statement of the specified basis for the exemption.

(2) The name, business address, and telephone number of the applicant.

(c) The board shall grant the exemption if the board finds that the manufacturer has been unable to commence manufacture of the rechargeable consumer product in compliance with this chapter and with an equivalent level of product performance without causing either of the following:

(1) Danger to human health and safety or to the environment.

(2) Violation of requirements for approvals from governmental agencies or the Underwriters Laboratories or a similar widely recognized private standard-setting organization.

(d) The board may, by regulation, establish an application fee in an amount sufficient to offset the cost of processing requests for exemptions.

(e) A manufacturer or manufacturer trade organization granted an exemption may apply for an extension of the exemption in accordance with the requirements and procedures in subdivisions (b) and (c). However, in considering an extension of any exemption, the board shall evaluate whether other rechargeable consumer product manufacturers have developed technology or methods that permit access to the rechargeable battery in the same or similar type application. The board may grant up to three extensions of not more than two years each after the date of the original exemption.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 816, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

15016.

Any action solely to increase the recycling of rechargeable batteries or battery packs by any person or entity that affects the types or quantities being recycled, or the cost and structure of any return program, pursuant to this chapter is not a violation of the Cartwright Act (Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 16700) of Part 2 of Division 7 of the Business and Professions Code) or the Unfair Practices Act (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 17000) of Part 2 of Division 7 of the Business and Professions Code).

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 816, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

15018.

For purposes of carrying out the collection, storage, transportation, and recycling of used rechargeable batteries or consumer products containing used rechargeable batteries, persons involved in returning used rechargeable batteries or consumer products containing used rechargeable batteries to a facility for recycling or proper disposal shall be subject to Section 25201 or 25216.1 of the Health and Safety Code or any successor section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 816, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. Mercury in Batteries [15020. - 15024.]

15020.

No person shall sell any dry cell battery manufactured on and after January 1, 1994, for household use in which the mercury content, by weight, exceeds the following limits:

(a) In an alkaline battery, 0.025 percent.

(b) In a carbon-zinc battery, 0.0 percent intentionally introduced mercury, as distinguished from mercury which may be incidentally present in other materials.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 817, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

15021.

On and after January 1, 1994, no person shall manufacture or sell any mercuric oxide button cell battery of any type or for any use.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 817, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

15022.

No person shall sell any alkaline manganese battery manufactured on or after January 1, 1996, if the battery contains any intentionally introduced mercury, as distinguished from mercury which may be incidentally present in other materials. However, the mercury content in alkaline manganese button cell batteries shall not exceed 25 milligrams of mercury per button cell.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 817, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

15023.

No person shall sell any zinc-carbon battery manufactured on or after January 1, 1994, if the battery contains any intentionally introduced mercury, as distinguished from mercury which may be incidentally present in other materials.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 817, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

15024.

Any violation of this chapter is a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 817, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5. Consumer Products Containing Mercury [15025. - 15029.]

15025.

For purposes of this article, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Mercury-added novelty” means a mercury-added product intended mainly for personal or household enjoyment or adornment. A “mercury-added novelty” includes, but is not limited to, any item intended for use as a practical joke, figurine, adornment, toy, game, card, ornament, yard statue or figure, candle, jewelry, holiday decoration, and item of apparel, including footwear. “Mercury-added novelty” does not include a product that contains no mercury other than in a mercury-added button cell battery.

(b) “Mercury fever thermometer” means a mercury-added product that is used for measuring body temperature. Mercury fever thermometer does not include a digital thermometer that uses mercury-added button cell batteries.

(c) “School” means any school used for the purpose of the education of more than 12 children in kindergarten or any of grades 1 to 12, inclusive.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 625, Sec. 2.   Effective September 17, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

15026.

(a) On and after July 1, 2002, no person, other than a person licensed pursuant to Article 9 (commencing with Section 4140) of Chapter 9 of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code, may sell at retail, or otherwise supply, a mercury fever thermometer to a consumer or patient in this state. A mercury fever thermometer may be sold at retail, or otherwise supplied to a consumer or patient only upon the prescription of a physician, dentist, veterinarian, or podiatrist. A mercury fever thermometer sold at retail shall be accompanied by clear written instructions concerning careful handling to avoid breakage and proper cleanup should breakage occur.

(b) A violation of subdivision (a) is a violation of the requirements of Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 4000) of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code and the California State Board of Pharmacy shall enforce the requirements of subdivision (a) in accordance with Chapter 9.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 656, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

15027.

(a) On and after January 1, 2003, no person shall manufacture, offer for final sale or use, or distribute for promotional purposes in this state, a mercury-added novelty, if the manufacturer, seller, or distributor knows, or has reason to know, that the product contains mercury. A person who manufactures or distributes any mercury-added novelty shall notify each retailer regarding the requirements of this section and how to dispose of the remaining inventory in accordance with Chapter 6.5 (commencing with Section 25100) of Division 20 of the Health and Safety Code.

(b) A violation of subdivision (a) is a violation of Article 2 (commencing with Section 108550) of Chapter 5 of Part 3 of Division 104 of the Health and Safety Code and, for purposes of that article, “mercury-added novelties” shall be deemed to be toys. The State Department of Health Services may take action against mercury-added novelties in the same manner as it is authorized to take action against toys, except that a violation of subdivision (a) is a misdemeanor punishable by a fine not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each violation, or by imprisonment in the county jail for a period not to exceed one year, or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 656, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

15028.

No school in this state shall purchase, for use in the classroom, elemental mercury, mercury compounds, or mercury-added laboratory measurement devices, chemicals, and related materials, except measuring devices used in school laboratories for which the school district determines no adequate substitute exists.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 656, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

15029.

No person may sell or offer for sale in this state a vehicle manufactured on or after January 1, 2005, that contains a mercury-containing motor vehicle light switch, as defined in Section 25214.5 of the Health and Safety Code, mounted on the hood or trunk.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 656, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 12.3. RECYCLED CONCRETE [16000. - 16004.]

16000.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) Facilitating the recycling of natural resources is in the best interest of the state.

(b) Facilitating recycling of concrete materials in concrete production reduces waste, truck trips, and emissions, while advancing sustainable practices in concrete manufacture.

(c) Recycling of aggregates from concrete conserves the natural resources of aggregates.

(d) Recycling of water conserves water resources.

(e) Recycling of returned fresh concrete maximizes the reuse of the natural resources of aggregates, water, and cement and conserves embodied energy from concrete production.

(f) This division is intended to encourage the use of recycled concrete as provided in this
 division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 154, Sec. 1.   (AB 221)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

16001.

For purposes of this division, “recycled concrete” means reclaimed concrete material used in concrete mixtures in accordance with the “Greenbook Standard Specifications for Public Works” 2003 edition, or the most current revision of those requirements. “Recycled concrete” includes mix designs or aggregate gradations that are in accordance with the specifications or codes of the American Concrete Institute (ACI), the American Society of Testing and Materials (ASTM), the International Building Code (IBC), the International Residential Code (IRC), the California Building Code (Part 2 (commencing with Section 1.1.1) of Title 24 of the California Code of Regulations), Caltrans Standard Specifications, or the California Green
 Building Standards Code (Part 11 (commencing with Section 101.1) of Title 24 of the California Code of Regulations). However, reclaimed concrete material that is in compliance with ASTM-94 specifications is exempt from this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 154, Sec. 2.   (AB 221)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

16002.

(a) Recycled concrete materials may be used if a user has been fully informed that the concrete may contain recycled concrete materials.

(b) For the purposes of this section, “fully informed” means informed of the potential use of recycled materials in a concrete product prior to or at the time of ordering, either orally or in writing, and informed by the delivery receipt as to the recycled ingredients at delivery acceptance.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 693, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

16003.

No recycled concrete shall be offered, provided, or sold to the Department of Transportation or the Department of General Services for any use, including, but not limited to, any project under its affiliation, contract authority, or oversight responsibility unless specifically requested and approved by the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 693, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

16004.

This division does not supersede the requirements of the California Building Code or other provisions of law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 154, Sec. 3.   (AB 221)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 12.4. GREASE TRAP AND GREASE INTERCEPTOR WASTE [16050. - 16053.]

16050.

For purposes of this division, “grease waste hauler” means a transporter of inedible kitchen grease subject to the registration requirements in Section 19310 of the Food and Agricultural Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 186, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

16051.

(a) A grease waste hauler shall not remove grease from a grease trap or grease interceptor unless the hauler removes all grease, greasy liquid, water, and solids from the grease trap or grease interceptor each time of removal.

(b) Subdivision (a) does not require a grease interceptor or grease trap to be cleaned of de minimus residue that cannot be removed by normal procedures, including, but not limited to, pumping or other cleaning, or residue resulting from systems that have continuous flow.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 186, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

16052.

A violation of this division may only be enforced against a grease waste hauling company and shall not be enforced against an employee of the grease waste hauler.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 186, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

16053.

(a) A grease waste hauler who violates this division shall be subject to a civil penalty, for the first violation, in an amount that does not exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000).

(b) A grease waste hauler who violates this division, for a second or subsequent violation, shall be subject to a civil penalty in an amount that does not exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000).

(c) A grease waste hauler who violates this division may also be subject to any further equitable remedy, as determined by the court.

(d) The civil penalties collected pursuant to this division shall be apportioned as follows:

(1) Fifty percent shall be deposited in the Environmental Enforcement and Training Account established pursuant to Section 14303 of the Penal Code, and used for purposes of Title 13 (commencing with Section 14300) of Part 4 of the Penal Code.

(2) Fifty percent to the local health officer or other local public officer or agency that investigated the matter that led to bringing the action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 130, Sec. 205.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 12.5. COMMUNITY CONSERVATION CORPS [17000. - 17003.]

17000.

For purposes of this division, the following definitions shall apply:

(a) “Certified community conservation corps” means a community conservation corps that was in existence on September 30, 1999, or that is formed subsequent to that date, and that is designated by a city or a city and county to perform litter abatement, recycling, and related activities, if the city or the city and county has a population, as determined by the most recent census, of more than 250,000 persons.

(b) “Community conservation corps” means a community conservation corps, as defined in Section 14507.5, that is designated by a county to perform litter abatement, recycling, and related
 activities, and that is certified by the California Conservation Corps as having operated for a minimum of two years and as meeting all other criteria of Section 14507.5.

(c) “Department” means the Department of Resources Recycling and Recovery.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 35, Sec. 145.   (SB 861)   Effective June 20, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

17001.

(a) For purposes of the 2014–15 fiscal year only, subject to Section 17002, the department shall expend funds from the following sources, for issuing grants to certified community conservation corps and community conservation corps, in accordance with, and for the purposes specified in, this subdivision:

(1) The department shall expend the amount made available for expenditure during the 2014–15 fiscal year pursuant to Section 14581.1 in the form of grants for implementing beverage container litter reduction programs and beverage container recycling programs, including education and outreach, pursuant to Division 12.1 (commencing with Section 14501).

(2) The department shall expend four million dollars ($4,000,000) from the funds in the Electronic Waste Recovery and Recycling Account, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for grants to implement programs relating to the collection and recovery of covered electronic waste, including education and outreach, in accordance with Chapter 8.5 (commencing with Section 42460) of Part 3 of Division 30.

(3) The department shall expend two million five hundred thousand dollars ($2,500,000) from the funds in the California Tire Recycling Management Fund, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for grants relating to implementing programs to clean up and abate waste tires and to reuse and recycle waste tires, including, but not limited to, the tire recycling program authorized by Section 42872, and including education and outreach, in accordance with Chapter 17 (commencing with Section 42860) of Part 3 of Division 30.

(4) The department shall expend one million dollars ($1,000,000) from the funds in the California Used Oil Recycling Fund, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for grants to implement programs relating to the collection of used oil, including education and outreach, in accordance with Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 48600) of Part 7 of Division 30.

(b) On and after July 1, 2015, subject to Section 17002, the department shall expend funds from the following sources, for issuing grants to certified community conservation corps and community conservation corps, in accordance with, and for the purposes specified in, this subdivision:

(1) The department shall expend in each fiscal year the amount made available pursuant to Section 14581.1 for grants to implement beverage container litter reduction programs and beverage
 container recycling programs, including education and outreach, pursuant to Division 12.1 (commencing with Section 14501).

(2) The department shall expend eight million dollars ($8,000,000) each fiscal year from the funds in the Electronic Waste Recovery and Recycling Account, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for grants to implement programs relating to the collection and recovery of covered electronic waste, including education and outreach, in accordance with Chapter 8.5 (commencing with Section 42460) of Part 3 of Division 30.

(3) The department shall expend five million dollars ($5,000,000) each fiscal year from the funds in the California Tire Recycling Management Fund, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for grants to implement programs relating to clean up and abate waste tires and to reuse and recycle waste tires, including, but not limited to, the tire recycling
 program authorized by Section 42872, and including education and outreach, in accordance with Chapter 17 (commencing with Section 42860) of Part 3 of Division 30.

(4) The department shall expend two million dollars ($2,000,000) each fiscal year from the funds in the California Used Oil Recycling Fund, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for grants to implement programs relating to the collection of used oil, including education and outreach, in accordance with Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 48600) of Part 7 of Division 30.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 35, Sec. 145.   (SB 861)   Effective June 20, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

17002.

The amount the department may expend for a fiscal year pursuant to Section 17001 shall not exceed the amount determined for that fiscal year pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 14581.1.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 35, Sec. 145.   (SB 861)   Effective June 20, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

17003.

Notwithstanding the prohibition on hiring or retaining an employee with a controlled substance offense, as defined in Section 44011 of the Education Code, contained in Part 25 (commencing with Section 44000) of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Education Code, a school district or county office of education that operates a community conservation corps certified pursuant to Section 14507.5 may select an applicant for enrollment in the community conservation corps program who is on probation, parole, postrelease community supervision, or mandatory
 supervision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 571, Sec. 2.   (AB 278)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 12.7. PLASTIC WASTE [18000. - 18017.]



CHAPTER 1. Legislative Findings [18000. - 18000.]

18000.

The Legislature finds and declares the following:

(a) Facilitating the recycling of plastics is in the best interests of the state.

(b) This division is intended to require all plastic products sold in California on and after January 1, 1992, to have a molded label indicating the plastic resin used to produce the product.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 838, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Containers and Packaging [18010. - 18017.]

18010.

“Rigid plastic container” means any formed or molded article comprised predominantly of plastic resin and having a relatively inflexible finite shape or form intended primarily as a single service container with a capacity of eight ounces or more and less than five gallons.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 838, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

18011.

“Rigid plastic bottle” means any rigid plastic container with a neck that is smaller than the container body with a capacity of 16 ounces or more and less than five gallons.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 838, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

18012.

“Label” means a code label described in Section 18015 molded into the bottom of the plastic product.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 838, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

18013.

“Polyethylene terephthalate” means a plastic derived from a reaction between terephthalic acid or dimethyl terephthalate and monoethylene glycol as to which both of the following conditions are satisfied: 

(a) The terephthalic acid or dimethyl terephthalate and monoethylene glycol reacted constitutes at least 90 percent of the mass of the monomer reacted to form the polymer.

(b) The plastic exhibits a melting peak temperature that is between 225 degrees Celsius and 255 degrees Celsius, as determined during the second thermal scan using procedure 10.1 as set forth in ASTM International (ASTM) D3418 with a heating rate of a
 sample at 10 degrees Celsius per minute.

 (c) This section becomes operative on October 1, 2018.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 823, Sec. 1.   (AB 906)   Effective January 1, 2018.   Section operative October 1, 2018, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

18015.

(a) All rigid plastic bottles and rigid plastic containers sold in the state shall be labeled with a code that indicates the resin used to produce the rigid plastic bottle or rigid plastic container. Rigid plastic bottles or rigid plastic containers with labels and basecups of a different material shall be coded by their basic material. The code shall consist of a number placed inside a triangle, and letters placed below the triangle. The numbers and letters used shall be as follows:

1 = PETE (polyethylene terephthalate)

2 = HDPE (high density polyethylene)

3 = V (vinyl)

4 = LDPE (low density polyethylene)

5 = PP
 (polypropylene)

6 = PS (polystyrene)

7 = OTHER (includes multilayer)

(b) A “7” shall appear below the resin abbreviation when the bottle or container is composed of more than one layer of that resin.

(c) The Division of Recycling in the Department of Resources Recycling and Recovery shall maintain a list of abbreviations used on labels pursuant to subdivision (a) and shall provide a copy of that list to a person upon request.

(d) The resin identification code required pursuant to subdivision (a) shall not be placed inside a chasing arrows symbol, as defined in subdivision (f) of Section 17580 of the Business and Professions Code, unless the rigid plastic bottle or rigid plastic container meets the statewide recyclability criteria
 provided in subdivision (d) of Section 42355.51.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 507, Sec. 3.   (SB 343)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

18016.

On and after January 1, 1992, it is unlawful to manufacture for use in this state any rigid plastic container which is not labeled in accordance with Section 18015. A violation of this section is a crime punishable by a fine of one thousand dollars ($1,000).

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 838, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

18017.

This division does not apply to rigid plastic containers or rigid plastic bottles that are medical devices, medical products that are required to be sterile, prescription medicine, and packaging used for those products.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 115, Sec. 4.   (AB 793)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 12.9. FIBERGLASS RECYCLED CONTENT ACT OF 1991 [19500. - 19535.]



CHAPTER 1. Findings and Definitions [19500. - 19502.]

19500.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) Recycling of glass sold in the state benefits the state through reduction in the need for solid waste landfills, more efficient use of energy in manufacturing, and development of an economy more efficient in its use of secondary materials. 

(b) Because of the expansion of recycling collection programs in the state, there is a need to aggressively develop new markets for scrap glass. 

(c) The use of scrap glass in the manufacture of fiberglass products sold in California will contribute significantly to developing markets for recycled glass. 

(d) The use of cullet in fiberglass manufacturing presents no significant technical or financial barriers to industry or consumers, if the cullet meets minimum quality specifications. 

(e) In order to enhance the availability and efficiency of recycling opportunities, it is in the best interest of the health and safety of the people of the state to make alternative markets for recycled glass economically feasible.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 706, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

19501.

This division shall be known and may be cited as the Fiberglass Recycled Content Act of 1991.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 706, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

19502.

For purposes of this division, the following definitions shall apply:

(a) “Cullet” means postconsumer glass from food, drink, or beverage containers, or any other glass not generated by fiberglass manufacturing. 

(b) “Department” means the Department of Conservation. 

(c) “Fiberglass manufacturer” means a person who uses glass in the commercial manufacture of building insulation fiberglass for wholesale or retail sale in the state. 

(d) “Building insulation” means a fiberglass batt, blanket, loose fill or spray-in-place material primarily designed and used to resist heat flow, that is installed in roofs, ceilings, walls, and floors of buildings.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 706, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Fiberglass Recycled Content Program [19510. - 19512.]

19510.

Except as provided in Section 19511, every manufacturer shall ensure that the annual tonnage of fiberglass manufactured or sold in the state by that manufacturer on and after January 1, 1992, other than fiberglass in inventory manufactured for sale before January 1, 1992, shall contain at least 10 percent cullet .

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 706, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

19511.

The percentage of fiberglass sold which is made of cullet shall be calculated in tons used on an annual basis. Unless the department determines that an increase in the percentage of cullet would pose an unreasonable technical burden on the fiberglass manufacturer that exceeds the benefits to recycling the cullet, each fiberglass manufacturer shall increase the percentage of cullet in fiberglass in accordance with the following requirements:

(a) On and after January 1, 1994, until December 31, 1994, the percentage of cullet shall be 20 percent. 

(b) On and after January 1, 1995, the percentage of cullet shall be 30 percent.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 706, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

19512.

On or before January 1, 1994, the department shall request comments from at least two fiberglass manufacturers, two cullet processors, and any other interested parties on the feasibility of increasing the percentage of cullet in fiberglass to 30 percent. On or before July 1, 1994, the department shall hold a public hearing, on the record, with representatives from the fiberglass industry, cullet processors, and other interested parties to determine the feasibility of increasing cullet content in fiberglass manufacturing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 706, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Cullet Specifications for Fiberglass Manufacturing [19515. - 19519.]

19515.

The quality specifications provided in this chapter are the minimum quality specifications which cullet is required to meet for purposes of the exemption specified in Section 19522.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 706, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

19515.5.

Chemical Composition Tolerance(+ or -OxidesPercentage WeightPercentage Range)Silicon Dioxide66-751.00Aluminum Oxide 0-7 0.50Calcium Oxide 5-150.50Magnesium Oxide 0-5 0.50Sodium Oxide 8-180.50Potassium Oxide 0-4 0.50Iron Oxide less than 0.50.05Chromium Oxide less than 0.10.02Sulfur Trioxide less than 0.20.02All other oxides less than 0.10.02Organic Carbon less than 0.10.02Moisture Content less than 0.50.05(No caking with free-flowing fiberglass)Loss on Ignition less than 1.00.10

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 706, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

19516.

ContaminantsOther Inorganic MaterialPercentage Weight+ 12 MeshNone+ 20 Meshless than 0.1− 20 Meshless than 0.2Magnetic Materialsless than 0.1Nonmagnetic MetalsNone

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 706, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

19517.

Physical Composition Particle Size: Cullet shall be one of two types below depending upon the requirements of the fiberglass manufacturer.Screen SizeCoarse CulletFine Cullet+ ¼″ 0% 0%+ 12 Mesh25% Minimum 0.5%
 Maximum– 200 Mesh15% Maximum15.0% MaximumColor DistributionTolerance(+ or –TypeNominal Percentage WeightPercentage Range)Flint0–100+ or– 3.0Green1–100+ or– 3.0Amberless than 25+ or– 3.0

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 706, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

19518.

The department may change minimum quality specifications based upon the fiberglass industries’ ability to use cullet with higher levels of contamination.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 706, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

19519.

A fiberglass manufacturer shall comply with all applicable state and federal laws, regulations, and permits concerning the environment, health, or safety when using cullet in fiberglass manufacturing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 706, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. Certification of Use [19520. - 19523.]

19520.

Each fiberglass manufacturer shall, on or before March 1 of each year, submit a report to the department certifying the number of tons of cullet used for the manufacture of fiberglass during the preceding calendar year and the number of tons of fiberglass sold in the state during the preceding calendar year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 706, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

19521.

Every fiberglass manufacturer who submits glass cullet content usage certification pursuant to Section 19520 may be subject to an audit by the department to ensure that the cullet was used.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 706, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

19522.

If a manufacturer of fiberglass is unable to obtain sufficient amounts of cullet within any certification period, the manufacturer shall certify this fact to the department and provide the department with the specific reason for failing to use cullet, including verification of a best faith effort to use the cullet, and evidence that the cullet failed to meet minimum quality specifications pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 19515) and, therefore, presented a significant barrier to meeting the requirements of Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 19510).

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 706, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

19523.

For the purposes of implementing and enforcing these provisions, the department shall develop and maintain a list which identifies all fiberglass manufacturers. The department shall also make available to fiberglass manufacturers names and addresses of all recyclers and processors of cullet certified pursuant to Division 12.1 (commencing with Section 14500).

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 706, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5. Enforcement [19530. - 19535.]

19530.

If any person provides a fiberglass manufacturer with false or misleading information concerning the recycled content of glass cullet, the department, within 30 days of making this determination, shall refer the false or misleading certificate to the Attorney General for prosecution for fraud.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 706, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

19531.

If any fiberglass manufacturer provides the department with a false or misleading certificate concerning the percentage of glass cullet used pursuant to this division pursuant to Section 19520, the department, within 30 days of making this determination, shall refer the false or misleading certificate to the Attorney General for prosecution for fraud.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 706, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

19532.

If any fiberglass manufacturer provides the department with a false or misleading certificate concerning why the fiberglass manufacturer was unable to meet the content requirements due to technical infeasibility pursuant to Section 19522, the department, within 30 days of making this determination, shall refer the false or misleading certificate to the Attorney General for prosecution for fraud.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 706, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

19533.

Information on glass cullet prices or other prices obtained by the department in the course of an audit is proprietary information and the department shall not make this information available to the general public.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 706, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

19534.

This division does not prevent a person from selling or using fiberglass made of 100 percent virgin content, as long as the fiberglass manufacturer meets the content requirements of Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 19510).

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 706, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

19535.

(a) Any person who violates Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 19510) or this section is guilty of an infraction punishable by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000). 

(b) In addition to subdivision (a), any person who violates this division may be assessed a civil penalty by the department of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each violation, pursuant to a notice and a hearing conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. Any civil penalties and fines received pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the Fiberglass Recycled Content Account, which is hereby established in the California Beverage Container Recycling Fund, and the funds in that account may be expended by the department for the administration of this division upon appropriation by the Legislature.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 706, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 13. ENVIRONMENTAL QUALITY [21000. - 21189.91.]



CHAPTER 1. Policy [21000. - 21006.]

21000.

The Legislature finds and declares as follows:

(a) The maintenance of a quality environment for the people of this state now and in the future is a matter of statewide concern.

(b) It is necessary to provide a high-quality environment that at all times is healthful and pleasing to the senses and intellect of man.

(c) There is a need to understand the relationship between the maintenance of high-quality ecological systems and the general welfare of the people of the state, including their enjoyment of the natural resources of the state.

(d) The capacity of the environment is limited, and it is the intent of the Legislature that the government of the state take immediate steps to identify any critical thresholds for the health and safety of the people of the state and take all coordinated actions necessary to prevent such thresholds being reached.

(e) Every citizen has a responsibility to contribute to the preservation and enhancement of the environment.
